Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.094

Quality control review of joint committee.

Subject to the joint committee's approval, the office of the joint committee shall undergo an external quality control review within three years of June 6, 1996, and at regular intervals thereafter. The review must be conducted by an independent organization that has experience in conducting performance audits. The quality control review must include, at a minimum, an evaluation of the quality of the audits conducted by the joint committee, an assessment of the audit procedures used by the joint committee, and an assessment of the qualifications of the joint committee staff to conduct performance audits.

[ 1996 c 288 s 15.]